incubator/apertium-en-sco.sco.dix
    <pardef n="h/ae__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evin</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evin</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evin</l>
          <r>ae<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/be__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wis</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wis</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wir</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="na__S"/>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>been</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bein</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bein</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bein</l>
          <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ocht</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ocht</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingin</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingin</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingin</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bur/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yin</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yin</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yin</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="ga/ng__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ngs</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>ng<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="boo__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="caa__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bring"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bury"><i>bur</i><par n="bur/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bery"><i>ber</i><par n="bur/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gang"><i>ga</i><par n="ga/ng__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="boo"><i>boo</i><par n="boo__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="caa"><i>caa</i><par n="caa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="hae"><i>h</i><par n="h/ae__vbmod"/></e>
